Utah statutes.
63B-15-101.   Capital facilities bonds -- Utah Science Technology and
Research Governing Authority -- Maximum amount -- Projects authorized.
(1) (a)  The total amount of bonds issued under this section may not exceed
$111,100,000.
(b)  When Utah State University certifies to the commission that the
university has obtained reliable commitments, convertible to cash, of
$10,000,000 or more in nonstate funds to construct the Bio Innovations
Research Institute, and when the chairs of the Legislature's Executive
Appropriations Committee have certified that the committee has heard a
presentation by the chair of the bonding commission and the Utah Science
Technology and Research Governing Authority on the project, the commission may
issue and sell general obligation bonds in a total amount not to exceed
$40,400,000.
(c)  When the University of Utah certifies to the commission that the
university has obtained reliable commitments, convertible to cash, of
$30,000,000 or more in nonstate funds to construct the Neuroscience and
Biomedical Technology Research Building, and when the chairs of the
Legislature's Executive Appropriations Committee have certified that the
committee has heard a presentation by the chair of the bonding commission and
the Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority on the project,
the commission may issue and sell general obligation bonds in a total amount
not to exceed $70,700,000.
(2) (a)  Proceeds from the issuance of bonds shall be provided to the Utah
Science Technology and Research Governing Authority to provide funds to pay
all or part of the cost of acquiring and constructing the projects listed in
this Subsection (2).
(b)  These costs may include the cost of acquiring easements and rights-of-
way, improving sites, and acquiring, constructing, equipping, and furnishing
facilities and all structures, roads, parking facilities, utilities, and
improvements necessary, incidental, or convenient to the facilities, interest
estimated to accrue on these bonds during the period to be covered by
construction of the projects plus a period of six months after the end of the
construction period, and all related engineering, architectural, and legal
fees.
(c)  For the Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority,
proceeds shall be provided for the following:
------------------------------------------------------------------------------
------------------------------------
CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS
Estimated Operations                    Amount
Project Description                     and Maintenance                 Funded
------------------------------------------------------------------------------
-------------------------------------
Bio Innovations Research Institute --
Utah State University                           $0
$40,000,000
Neuroscience and Biomedical Technology
Research Building -- University of Utah $0
$70,000,000
TOTAL CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS
$110,000,000
------------------------------------------------------------------------------
-------------------------------------
TOTAL GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND AUTHORIZATION
FOR CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS                                  $110,000,000
------------------------------------------------------------------------------
-------------------------------------
(d)  The Legislature intends that the Utah Science Technology and Research
Governing Authority pay the operations and maintenance costs on the research
buildings authorized by this section.
(3) (a)  The amounts funded as listed in Subsection (2) are estimates only and
do not constitute a limitation on the amount that may be expended for the
projects.
(b)  The commission, by resolution and in consultation with the Utah Science
Technology and Research Governing Authority, may delete the project if the
inclusion of that project could be construed to violate state law or federal
law or regulation.
(4)  The Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority  may enter
into agreements related to the project before the receipt of proceeds of bonds
issued under this chapter.
(5)  The commission or the state treasurer may make any statement of intent
relating to that reimbursement that is necessary or desirable to comply with
federal tax law.
(6)  The commission may not issue or execute bonds authorized by this section
that have a maturity date or dates of more than 20 years after the date of
delivery of the bonds.
(7)  The Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority shall
contract with the Division of Facilities Construction and Management to
oversee construction of the buildings.
(8)  The Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority may not
delegate authority over construction of the capitol development projects
identified in this section to any entity other than the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management.
